Utah statutes.
53B-6-105.7.   Initiative student scholarship program.

(1) (a)  There is established an engineering, computer science, and related technology scholarship program as a component of the initiative created in Section 53B-6-105.

(b)  The program is established to recruit, retain, and train engineering, computer science, and related technology students to assist in providing for and advancing the intellectual and economic welfare of the state.

(2) (a)  The board:

(i)  may make rules for the overall administration of the scholarship program in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(ii)  shall administer the program in consultation with the Technology Initiative Advisory Board created in Section 53B-6-105.5.

(b)  The board shall also use the following policies and procedures in administering the student scholarship program:

(i)  students may use scholarship money at any institution within the state system of higher education that offers an engineering, computer science, or related technology degree;

(ii)  scholarships shall be given to students who declare an intent to complete a prescribed course of instruction in one of the areas referred to in Subsection (2)(b)(i) and to work in the state after graduation in one of those areas; and

(iii)  a scholarship may be cancelled at any time by the institution of attendance, if the student fails to make reasonable progress towards obtaining the degree or there appears to be a reasonable certainty that the student does not intend to work in the state upon graduation.

(3) (a)  By June 1 of each year, the Technology Initiative Advisory Board shall recommend to the board a distribution of the scholarship funds to institutions in the state system of higher education, based on a formula.

(b)  The Technology Initiative Advisory Board shall develop the formula for distribution of total scholarship funds to the institutions, which shall contain the following components:

(i)  the number of graduates of engineering, computer science, and related technology degrees from the previous year;

(ii)  the number and level of engineering, computer science, and related technology degrees offered at an institution; and

(iii)  the length of each engineering, computer science, and related technology degree offered at an institution.

(4)  The Legislature shall make an annual appropriation to the board to fund the student scholarship program created in this section.



Amended by Chapter 210, 2009 General Session

